Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2702
Health care crisis protocol, defined.

For purposes of the Health Care Crisis Protocol Act, health care crisis protocol means the plans and protocols for triage and the application of medical services and resources for critically ill patients in the event that the demand for medical services and resources exceeds supply as a result of a pervasive or catastrophic disaster as provided in the Health Care Crisis Protocol for the State of Nebraska published by the Nebraska Medical Emergency Operations Center, dated May 10, 2021.

Laws 2021, LB139, § 6.

COVID-19 Liability Act, see section 25-3601.